Utah statutes.
53B-19-101.   Establishment of state arboreta -- Purpose.
In recognition of the cultural role that trees and shrubbery and birds and
bees have played in the settlement and development of this state and the
hardships that many of the pioneers endured to bring to this land seeds,
plants, trees, and shrubs which have contributed so much to the scenic beauty
of this state, it is deemed expedient that state arboreta be established for
the purpose of further developing a knowledge and appreciation of trees and
shrubs and to provide a place where they may be planted and cultivated as
memorials and for the cultural enjoyment of the people of the state.
